Montana, session 2025, HB596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 69-12-314, MCA, is amended to read:
"69-12-314. Class D motor carrier certificate of public convenience and necessity. (1) Class D
carriers shall conduct operations pursuant to a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the
commission authorizing the transportation of the commodities described in 69-12-301(3). Class D carriers,
when applying for a new or additional certificate of public convenience and necessity, shall file an application
with the commission in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and the rules of the commission.
(2) A motor carrier may not possess a Class D motor carrier certificate of public convenience or
necessity or operate as a Class D motor carrier unless the motor carrier actually engages in the transportation
of garbage on a regular basis as part of the motor carrier's usual business operation.
(3) A person or entity providing garbage cleanup and transportation service on an irregular basis in
which rates are set based on a one-time service agreement for transport between specific locations may
engage in the transportation of garbage without possessing a Class D motor carrier certificate. The person or
entity providing this service may not use a vehicle that requires a commercial driver's license or other special
driver's license."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 596